District of Columbia statutes.
1-336.05

Liability.

Present, future, and former District of Columbia Retirement Board members and employees shall be indemnified by the District of Columbia from all claims and liability, including court costs and attorney’s fees, because of any action taken pursuant to this part.

History

Mar. 21, 2009, D.C. Law 17-337, § 105, 56 DCR 939